Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums

381.9125.
Creation of condominium.

A condominium may be created pursuant to KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

only by recording a declaration executed in the same manner as a deed. The declaration shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located, and shall be indexed in the name of the condominium, the association, and each person executing the declaration. The county clerk shall determine the methods and mechanics for recording and storing any plans and plats associated with a declaration or amendment of a declaration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 13, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9127.
Unit boundaries.

If walls, floors, or ceilings are designated as boundaries of a unit, all lath, furring, wallboard, plasterboard, plaster, paneling, tiles, wallpaper, paint, finished flooring, and any other materials constituting any part of the finished surfaces thereof are a part of the unit, and all other portions of the walls, floors, or ceilings are a part of the common elements unless otherwise specified in the declaration.

If any chute, flue, duct, wire, conduit, heating system, air conditioning system, bearing wall, bearing column, or any other fixture lies partially within and partially outside the designated boundaries of a unit, any portion thereof serving only that unit is a limited common element allocated solely to that unit, and any portion thereof serving more than one (1) unit or any portion of the common elements is a part of the common elements unless otherwise specified in the declaration.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, all spaces, interior partitions, and other fixtures and improvements within the boundaries of a unit are a part of the unit.

Any shutters, awnings, window boxes, doorsteps, stoops, porches, balconies, patios, and all exterior doors and windows or other fixtures designed to serve a single unit, but located outside the unit’s boundaries, are limited common elements allocated exclusively to that unit.

Any sprinkler system, alarm system, or other system of protection that serves more than one (1) unit, unless all units served are owned by the same owner, shall be part of the common elements.

All interior hallways, stairways, and other interior space, including all fixtures located within these spaces, that are located outside of a unit shall be limited common elements allocated exclusively to the units appurtenant to or otherwise accessible from such interior spaces.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 14, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9129.
Construction and validity of declaration and bylaws.

All provisions of the declaration and bylaws are severable.

The rule against perpetuities shall not be applied to defeat any provision of the declaration, bylaws, rules, or regulations adopted pursuant to KRS

381.9167

.

In the event of a conflict between the provisions of the declaration and the bylaws, the declaration prevails except to the extent the declaration is inconsistent with KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

.

Title to a unit and common elements is not rendered unmarketable or otherwise affected by reason of an insubstantial failure of the declaration to comply with KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 15, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9131.
Description of units.

After the declaration is recorded, a description of a unit which sets forth the name of the condominium, the recording data for the deed and declaration, the county in which the condominium is located, and the identifying number of the unit, is a sufficient legal description of that unit and all rights, obligations, and interests appurtenant to that unit. The numbering system of units shall be adequate to easily distinguish each unit, including those built at different times.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 16, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9133.
Contents of declaration.

The declaration for a condominium shall contain:

The name of the condominium which shall include the word “condominium” or be followed by the words “a condominium,” and the association;

The name of every county in which any part of the condominium is situated;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate included in the condominium;

A statement of the maximum number of units which the declarant reserves the right to create;

A description of the boundaries of each unit created by the declaration, including the unit’s identifying number;

A description of any limited common elements as provided in KRS

381.9141

(2)(h), except for those limited common elements specified in KRS 381.9127(2), (4), and (6);

A description of any real estate, except real estate subject to development rights, which may be allocated subsequently as limited common elements, other than limited common elements specified in KRS 381.9127(2), (4), and (6), together with a statement that they may be so allocated;

A description of any development rights and other special declarant rights reserved by the declarant, together with a legally sufficient description of the real estate to which each of those rights applies, and a time limit within which each of those rights must be exercised;

If any development right may be exercised with respect to different parcels of real estate at different times, a statement to that effect together with:

A statement fixing the boundaries of those portions and identifying the proposed order in which those portions may be subjected to the exercise of each development right; or

A statement that no assurances are made concerning the boundaries or order in which the exercise of development rights may occur; and

A statement as to whether, if any development right is exercised in any portion of the real estate subject to that development right, that development right must be exercised in all or in any other portion of the remainder of that real estate;

Any other conditions or limitations under which the rights described in paragraph (i) of this subsection may be exercised or will lapse;

An allocation to each unit of the allocated interests in the manner described in KRS

381.9137

;

Any restrictions on use, occupancy, and alienation of the units;

The recording data for recorded easements and licenses appurtenant to or included in the condominium or to which any portion of the condominium is or may become subject by virtue of a reservation in the declaration; and

All matters required by KRS

381.9135

,

381.9137

,

381.9139

,

381.9141

,

381.9153

, and 381.9169(4).

The declaration may contain any other matters the declarant deems appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 17, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9135.
Leasehold condominiums.

A memorandum of lease shall be recorded with respect to any lease the expiration or termination of which may terminate the condominium or reduce its size. Every lessor of those leases shall sign the memorandum of lease, and the memorandum of lease shall state:

The elements of recording for the lease;

The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;

A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;

Any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner whereby those rights may be exercised, or a statement that they do not have those rights;

Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that they do not have those rights; and

Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any renewal, or a statement that they do not have those rights.

After the declaration for a leasehold condominium is recorded, neither the lessor nor his or her successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit owner who makes timely payment of his or her share of the rent and otherwise complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate the lease. A unit owner’s leasehold interest is not affected by failure of any other person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant.

Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are acquired.

If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a condominium, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with KRS 381.9113(1), as though those units had been taken by eminent domain. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 18, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9137.
Allocation of common element interests, votes, and common expense liabilities.

The declaration shall allocate a fraction or percentage of undivided interests in the common elements and in the common expenses of the association, and a portion of the votes in the association, to each unit and state the formulas used to establish those allocations. Those allocations shall not discriminate in favor of units owned by the declarant.

If units may be added to or withdrawn from the condominium, the declaration shall state the formulas to be used to reallocate the allocated interests among all units included in the condominium after the addition or withdrawal.

The declaration may provide:

That different allocations of votes shall be made to the units on particular matters specified in the declaration; and

For class voting on specified issues affecting the class if necessary to protect valid interests of the class. A declarant shall not utilize cumulative or class voting for the purpose of evading any limitation imposed on declarants by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, and units shall not constitute a class because they are owned by a declarant.

The declaration shall not permit cumulative voting, including cumulative voting for the purpose of electing members of the executive board.

Unless otherwise stated in the declaration, the declarant retains full voting rights to any unit until it conveyed.

Except for minor variations due to rounding, the sum of the undivided interests in the common elements and common expense liabilities allocated at any time to all the units shall each equal one (1), if stated as fractions, or one hundred percent (100%), if stated as percentages. In the event of a discrepancy between an allocated interest and the result derived from application of the pertinent formula, the allocated interest prevails in the absence of error in specifying the allocated interest.

The common elements are not subject to partition, and any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of an undivided interest in the common elements made without the unit to which that interest is allocated, shall be void.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 19, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9139.
Limited common elements.

Except for the limited common elements described in KRS 381.9127(2), (4), and (6), the declaration shall specify to which unit or units each limited common element is allocated. That allocation shall not be altered without the consent of the unit owners whose units are affected.

Except as the declaration otherwise provides, a limited common element may be reallocated by an amendment to the declaration executed by the unit owners between or among whose units the reallocation is made. The persons executing the amendment shall provide a copy thereof to the association, which shall record it after receiving all fees and other costs associated with recording the instrument. The amendment shall be recorded in the names of the parties and the condominium.

A common element not previously allocated as a limited common element shall not be so allocated, except pursuant to provisions in the declaration made in accordance with KRS 381.9133(1)(g). The allocations shall be made by amendments to the declaration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 20, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9141.
Plats and plans.

Plats and plans are a part of the declaration. Separate plats and plans are not required by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

if all the information required by this section is contained in either a plat or plan. Each plat and plan shall be clear and legible and contain a certification that the plat or plan contains all information required by this section.

Each plat shall contain:

The name and a survey or general schematic map of the entire condominium;

The location and dimensions of all real estate not subject to development rights, or subject only to the development right to withdraw, and the location and dimensions of all existing improvements within that real estate;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate subject to development rights, labeled to identify the rights applicable to each parcel;

The extent of any encroachments by or upon any portion of the condominium;

The location, with reference to an established datum, of any horizontal unit boundaries not shown or projected on plans recorded pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and that unit’s identifying number;

A legally sufficient description of any real estate in which the unit owners will own only an estate for years, labeled as “leasehold real estate”;

The distance between noncontiguous parcels of real estate comprising the condominium;

The location and dimensions of limited common elements, including porches, balconies, and patios, other than parking spaces and the other limited common elements described in KRS 381.9127(2), (4), and (6); and

In the case of real estate not subject to development rights, all other matters customarily shown on land surveys prepared in accordance with standards established pursuant to KRS

322.290

.

A plat may also show the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvement to be constructed anywhere within the condominium. Any contemplated improvement shown shall be labeled either “MUST BE BUILT” or “NEED NOT BE BUILT.”

To the extent not shown or projected on the plats, plans of the units shall show or project:

Any horizontal unit boundaries exclusive of elevations, with reference to an established datum, and that unit’s identifying number; and

Any units in which the declarant has reserved the right to create additional units or common elements, identified appropriately.

Unless the declaration provides otherwise, the horizontal boundaries of part of a unit located outside of a building have the same elevation as the horizontal boundaries of the inside part, and need not be depicted on the plats and plans.

Upon exercising any development right, the declarant shall record either new plats and plans necessary to conform to the requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section, or new certifications of plats and plans previously recorded if those plats and plans otherwise conform to the requirements of subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section.

Any certification of a plat or plan required by KRS

381.9125

or this section shall be made by a professional land surveyor, licensed architect, or professional engineer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 21, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9143.
Exercise of development rights.

To exercise any development right reserved under KRS 381.9133(1)(h), the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration and comply with KRS

381.9141

. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby created. The amendment to the declaration shall assign an identifying number to each new unit created, and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units described in subsection (3) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among all units. The amendment shall describe any common elements and any limited common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements, designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by KRS

381.9139

.

Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the condominium if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required by KRS

381.9133

or

381.9135

, as the case may be, and the plats and plans include all matters required by KRS

381.9141

. This provision does not extend the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration under KRS

381.9133

(1)(h).

If a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit previously created into additional units, common elements, or both, the declaration shall be amended as follows:

If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the amendment to the declaration shall reallocate all the allocated interests of that unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain; or

If the declarant subdivides the unit into two (2) or more units, whether or not any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the declaration shall reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the declarant.

If the declaration provides, pursuant to KRS 381.9133(1)(h), that all or a portion of the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal, then the following shall apply:

If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser without the written consent of all unit owners owning units within the real estate; and

If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser without the written consent of all unit owners owning units within that portion.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 22, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9145.
Alteration of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner:

May make any improvements or alterations to his or her unit that do not impair the structural integrity, utility components, or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium;

Shall not change the appearance of the common elements, or the exterior appearance of a unit or any other portion of the condominium, without the written permission of the association; and

After acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity, utility components, or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the condominium. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this subsection is not an alteration of boundaries and neither creates a merged unit nor modifies the basis for the calculation and collection of assessments.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 23, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 3, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9147.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units. If the owners of the adjoining units have specified a reallocation between their units of their allocated interests, the application shall state the proposed reallocations. Unless the executive board determines, within thirty (30) days, that the reallocations are unreasonable, the association shall prepare an amendment that identifies the units involved, states the reallocations, is executed by those unit owners, contains words of conveyance between them, and upon recordation, is indexed in the name of the grantor and the grantee.

The association shall prepare and record plats or plans necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers.

All costs associated with the preparation and recording of the documents, plats, and plans required by this section shall be paid by the unit owners.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 24, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9149.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two (2) or more units. Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, upon application of a unit owner to subdivide a unit, the association shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration, including the plats and plans, subdividing that unit.

The amendment to the declaration shall be executed by the owner of the unit to be subdivided, assign an identifying number to each unit created, and reallocate the allocated interests formerly allocated to the subdivided unit to the new units in any reasonable manner prescribed by the owner of the subdivided unit.

All costs associated with the preparation and recording of the documents, plats, and plans required by subsection (1) of this section shall be paid by the owner of the unit being subdivided.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 25, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9151.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of his or her willful misconduct or relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to the plats and plans.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 26, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9153.
Easement rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or reserved in the declaration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 27, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9155.
Amendment of declaration.

Except in cases of amendments that may be executed by a declarant under KRS 381.9141(6) or

381.9143

; the association under KRS

381.9113

, 381.9135(4), 381.9139(3), 381.9147(1), or

381.9149

; or certain unit owners under KRS 381.9139(2), 381.9147(1), or

381.9149

(2), and except as limited by subsection (4) of this section and KRS 381.9187(6), the declaration, including the plats and plans, may be amended only by vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent (67%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger majority specified in the declaration. The declaration may specify a smaller number only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

An action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section shall not be brought more than one (1) year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located, and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment shall be indexed in the name of the condominium and the association and in the name of the parties executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, an amendment shall not create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, change the boundaries of any unit, the allocated interests of a unit, or the uses to which any unit is restricted, in the absence of unanimous consent of the unit owners.

Amendments to the declaration required by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 28, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 12, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9157.
Termination of condominium.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain, a condominium may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association are allocated, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the condominium are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

An agreement to terminate a condominium shall be evidenced by the execution of a termination agreement, or ratification thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement shall specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications thereof shall be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

In the case of a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold following termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement shall set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a condominium containing any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but shall not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all the unit owners consent to the sale.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real estate in the condominium, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If any real estate in the condominium is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale shall be distributed to unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of unit owners as provided in subsection (8) of this section. Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or the declaration.

If the real estate constituting the condominium is not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements and, in a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to all the real estate in the condominium, vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (8) of this section, and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit.

Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear. Following termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the units, which were recorded before termination, may enforce those liens in the same manner as any lienholder. All other creditors of the association are to be treated as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately before termination.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section are as follows:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the respective interests of unit owners are the fair market values of their units, limited common elements, and common element interests immediately before the termination, as determined by one (1) or more independent appraisers selected by the association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within thirty (30) days after distribution by unit owners of units to which twenty-five percent (25%) of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit owner’s interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and common element interest by the total fair market values of all the units and common elements; and

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value thereof before destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are their respective common element interests immediately before the termination.

Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against the entire condominium does not of itself terminate the condominium, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the condominium, other than withdrawable real estate, does not withdraw that portion from the condominium. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not of itself withdraw that real estate from the condominium, but the person taking title thereto has the right to require from the association, upon request, an amendment excluding the real estate from the condominium.

If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the condominium has priority over the declaration, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance may, upon foreclosure, record an instrument excluding the real estate subject to that lien or encumbrance from the condominium. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any common elements constituting a portion of the real estate to the extent the common elements as described in and subject to the declaration have been developed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 29, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9159.
Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the mortgagees encumbering the units approve specified actions of the unit owners or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but a requirement for approval shall not operate to:

Deny or delegate control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the unit owners or the executive board; or

Prevent the association or the executive board from commencing, intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceeding, or receiving and distributing any insurance proceeds except as provided in KRS

381.9187

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 30, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9161.
Master associations.

If the declaration for a condominium provides that any of the powers described in KRS

381.9167

are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a for-profit or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association which exercises those or other powers on behalf of one (1) or more condominiums or for the benefit of the unit owners of one (1) or more condominiums, all provisions of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

applicable to unit owners’ associations apply to any such corporation or unincorporated association, except as modified by this section.

Unless a master association is acting in the capacity of an association described in KRS

381.9165

, it may exercise the powers set forth in KRS 381.9167(1)(b) only to the extent expressly permitted in the declarations of condominiums which are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations of power from those condominiums to the master association.

If the declaration of any condominium provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those powers following delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners’ association set forth in KRS

381.9169

,

381.9177

,

381.9179

,

381.9181

, and

381.9185

apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to those persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise unit owners within the meaning of KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 381.9169(6) with respect to the election of the executive board of an association by all unit owners after the period of declarant control ends and even if a master association is also an association described in KRS

381.9165

, the certificate of incorporation or other instrument creating the master association and the declaration of each condominium the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association may provide that the executive board of the master association shall be elected after the period of declarant control in any of the following ways:

All unit owners of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board;

All members of the executive boards of all condominiums subject to the master association may elect all members of that executive board;

All unit owners of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board; or

All members of the executive board of each condominium subject to the master association may elect specified members of that executive board.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 31, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9163.
Merger or consolidation of condominiums.

Any two (2) or more condominiums by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (2) of this section, may be merged or consolidated into a single condominium. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant condominium is, for all purposes, the legal successor of all of the pre-existing condominiums and the operations and activities of all associations of the pre-existing condominiums shall be merged or consolidated into a single association which shall hold all powers, rights, obligations, assets, and liabilities of all pre-existing associations.

In addition to any other requirements of the declaration, the merger or consolidation of two (2) or more condominiums pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be evidenced by a recorded agreement duly executed by the president of the association of each of the pre-existing condominiums following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each condominium required to terminate that condominium. Any such agreement shall be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is located and is not effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement shall provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant condominium either:

By stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based; or

By stating the percentage of overall allocated interests of the new condominium which are allocated to all of the units comprising each of the pre-existing condominiums, and providing that the portion of the percentages allocated to each unit formerly comprising a part of the pre-existing condominium shall be equal to the percentages of allocated interests allocated to that unit by the declaration of the pre-existing condominium.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 32, effective January 1, 2011.